Washington statutes.
RCW 43.235.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Domestic violence fatality" means a homicide or suicide under any of the following circumstances:

(a) The alleged perpetrator and victim resided together at any time;

(b) The alleged perpetrator and victim have a child in common;

(c) The alleged perpetrator and victim were married, divorced, separated, or had a dating relationship;

(d) The alleged perpetrator had been stalking the victim;

(e) The homicide victim lived in the same household, was present at the workplace of, was in proximity of, or was related by blood or affinity to a victim who experienced or was threatened with domestic abuse by the alleged perpetrator; or

(f) The victim or perpetrator was a child of a person in a relationship that is described within this subsection.

This subsection should be interpreted broadly to give the domestic violence fatality review panels discretion to review fatalities that have occurred directly to domestic relationships.

[ 2000 c 50 s 1.]